Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.092

Administrative procedure act not applicable.

The adjudicative proceedings, judicial review, and civil enforcement provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, do not apply to any investigations, initial proceedings, public hearings, or executive sessions involving the discipline or retirement of a judge or justice.

[ 1989 c 367 s 7.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.